Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.060

Process—Service by constable or sheriff.

All process in actions and proceedings in justice courts, having a salaried constable, when served by an officer, shall be served by such constable or by the sheriff of the county or his or her duly appointed deputy; and all fees for such service shall be paid into the county treasury.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3004; 1909 c 132 s 1; RRS s 1760. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: 1903 c 19 s 1, part, now codified in RCW 12.04.050.]